Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.005

Findings.

(1) The legislature finds that locating acceptable housing and appropriate care for vulnerable adults is an important aspect of providing an appropriate continuity of care for senior citizens.

(2) The legislature further finds that locating appropriate and quality housing alternatives sometimes depends on elder and vulnerable adult referral agencies attempting to assist with referral.

(3) The legislature further finds that vulnerable adult referral professionals should be required to meet certain minimum requirements to promote better integration of vulnerable adult housing choices.

(4) The legislature further finds that the requirement that elder and vulnerable adult referral agencies meet minimum standards of conduct is in the interest of public health, safety, and welfare.

[ 2011 c 357 s 1.]